Idaho statutes. Title 68 TRUSTS AND FIDUCIARIES
Chapter 10
UNIFORM PRINCIPAL AND INCOME ACT

Part 1. Definitions and Fiduciary Duties

Sec.

Part 2. Decedent’s Estate or Terminating Income Interest

Part 3. Apportionment at Beginning And End of Income Interest

Part 4. Allocation of Receipts During Administration of Trust

Part 5. Allocation of Disbursements During Administration of Trust

Part 6. Miscellaneous Provisions